pt-PT: tamanho do receptor de montagem: 1,25 pol. (1 1/4 pol.); 2 pol.; 2,5 pol. (2 1/2 pol.); 3 pol.; Outro
sv: Storlek på monteringsmottagare: 1,25 tum (1 1/4 tum); 2 tum; 2,5 tum (2 1/2 tum); 3 tum; Övrigt
lt-LT: Montavimo imtuvo dydis: 1,25 col. (1 1/4 col.); 2 col.; 2,5 col. (2 1/2 col.); 3 col.; Kita
fi: Kiinnitysvastaanottimen koko: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Muu
fr: Taille du récepteur d’attelage: 1,25 po (1 1/4 po); 2 po; 2,5 po (2 1/2 po); 3 po; Autre
vi: Kích thước bộ thu tín hiệu lắp đặt: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Khác
zh-CN: 安装接收器尺寸: 1.25 英寸（1 1/4 英寸）; 2 英寸; 2.5 英寸（2 1/2 英寸）; 3 英寸; 其他
ro-RO: Dimensiunile receptorului de montare: 1,25 inchi (1 1/4 inchi); 2 inchi; 2,5 inchi (2 1/2 inchi); 3 inchi; Altele
zh-TW: 安裝接收器尺寸: 1.25 吋 (1 1/4 吋); 2 吋; 2.5 吋 (2 1/2 吋); 3 吋; 其他
th: ขนาดตัวรับการติดตั้ง: 1.25 นิ้ว (1 1/4 นิ้ว); 2 นิ้ว; 2.5 นิ้ว (2 1/2 นิ้ว); 3 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tamanho do receptor de engate: 1,25 pol. (1 1/4 pol.); 2 pol.; 2,5 pol. (2 1/2 pol.); 3 pol.; Outros
ja: マウントレシーバーのサイズ: 1.25インチ (1 1/4インチ); 2インチ; 2.5インチ (2 1/2インチ); 3インチ; その他
da: Størrelse på anhængertræksmodtager: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Andet
bg-BG: Размер на монтажния приемник: 1,25 инча (1 1/4 инча); 2 инча; 2,5 инча (2 1/2 инча); 3 инча; Друго
nl: Montageontvanger maat: 1,25 inch (1 1/4 inch); 2 inch; 2,5 inch (2 1/2 inch); 3 inch; Overig
sl-SI: Velikost montažnega priklopa: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Drugo
nb: Festemottakerens størrelse: 1,25 tommer (1 1/4 tommer); 2 tommer; 2,5 tommer (2 1/2 tommer); 3 tommer; Annet
ru: Размер приемного устройства крепления: 1,25 дюйма (1 1/4 дюйма); 2 дюйма; 2,5 дюйма (2 1/2 дюйма); 3 дюйма; Другое
de: Größe der Montageaufnahme: 1,25 Zoll (1 1/4 Zoll); 2 Zoll; 2,5 Zoll (2 1/2 Zoll); 3 Zoll; Sonstige
ko: 장착 수신기 크기: 1.25인치(1 1/4인치); 2인치; 2.5인치(2 1/2인치); 3인치; 기타
en: Mounting receiver size: 1.25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2.5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Other
el: Μέγεθος υποδοχής στήριξης: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Άλλο
hr-HR: Veličina montažnog prijemnika: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Ostalo
hu: Rögzítőelem mérete: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Egyéb
pl: Rozmiar odbiornika montażowego: 1,25 cala (1 1/4 cala); 2 cale; 2,5 cala (2 1/2 cala); 3 cale; Inne
es: Tamaño del receptor de enganche: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Otro
tr: Montaj alıcısı boyutu: 1,25 inç (1 1/4 inç); 2 inç; 2,5 inç (2 1/2 inç); 3 inç; Diğer
cs: Velikost montážní konzoly: 1,25 palce (1 1/4 palce); 2 palce; 2,5 palce (2 1/2 palce); 3 palce; Jiné
it: Dimensione del ricevitore del gancio traino: 1,25 in (1 1/4 in); 2 in; 2,5 in (2 1/2 in); 3 in; Altro
sk-SK: Veľkosť montážneho rámu: 1,25 palca (1 1/4 palca); 2 palce; 2,5 palca (2 1/2 palca); 3 palce; Iné